North Dakota, session 69, HB1399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 31-01-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
31-01-16. Compensation and mileage and travel expense of witness.
1. A witness in a civil or criminal case is entitled to receive:
1. a. A sum of twenty-five dollars for each day necessarily in attendance before the
district court or before any other board or tribunal, except municipal court.
2. b. A sum for mileage and travel expense reimbursement equal to the
reimbursement rates provided for state employees in sections 44-08-04 and
54-06-09.
2. In all criminal cases in district court, the attorney general shall pay prosecution witness
fees and expenses, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollarsthirty
thousand dollars per county per biennium, and the commission on legal counsel for
indigents shall pay witness fees and expenses for witnesses in those cases in which
counsel has been provided by the commission. Prisoners may not be compensated as
witnesses under this section. If a county exceeds the thirty thousand dollar
reimbursement during a biennium, the county may enter an agreement with another
county for the purpose of allowing that county to receive another county's unused
reimbursement funds for that biennium, with the approval of the attorney general.
Page No. 1 25.0998.02000